Tennessee, session 114, HB2373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, Chapter 7, is amended by adding
the following new section:
(a)
(1) A local unit of government that requires all full-time certified local
correctional officers to complete an in-service training course each calendar year
is entitled to receive from the institute a pay supplement of eight hundred dollars
($800) for each officer each year, to be paid to each officer, in addition to the
officer's regular salary, if the training course is:
(A) Provided or approved by the institute;
(B) Appropriate to the officer's rank and responsibility and the size
and location of the officer's department; and
(C) At least forty (40) hours in duration.
(2) Certified local correctional officers are eligible for the pay supplement
upon successful completion of forty (40) hours of in-service training.
(3) A local correctional officer who has not completed eight (8) months of
full-time service during the calendar year is not eligible to receive the salary
supplement, except in the case of the death of the officer, retirement, or medical
disability. Upon submission of proper documentation by an officer, the institute
HB2373
010652
- 1 -

shall include time spent in active military service when calculating the required
eight (8) months of full-time service.
(4) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a local correctional
officer who served or serves on active duty in the armed forces of the United
States during a period of armed conflict prescribed by presidential proclamation
or federal law must receive the cash salary supplement provided pursuant to this
section, if such service prevented or prevents such local correctional officer from
attending the in-service training program authorized pursuant to this section.
(5) If a local correctional officer does not complete the required in-service
training program due to the death of the officer while in the line of duty, then the
officer's designated beneficiary must receive the cash salary supplement
provided pursuant to this section despite the failure of the officer to complete the
required in-service training.
(b) The institute funds made available under subsection (a) to local units of
government must be received, held, and expended in accordance with subsections (a)-
(c), including the rules promulgated by the institute, and the following specific
restrictions:
(1) Funds provided must be used only as a cash salary supplement to
local correctional officers;
(2) Funds provided must not be used to supplant existing salaries or as
substitutes for normal salary increases periodically owed to local correctional
officers;
(3) The training pay supplement is a bonus for the successful completion
of training and is not considered part of the local correctional officer's salary for a
subsequent years' determination of supplemental pay or for retirement purposes;
- 2 - 010652

(4) Except in the case of retirement or medical disability, a local
correctional officer who terminates employment is not eligible to receive the
training supplement regardless of completing the required training; and
(5) Local correctional officers certified with the Tennessee peace officer
standards and training commission and the institute are not eligible for both
training supplements. Employees designated as support or non-facility support,
as defined by the minimum standards of the institute, are not eligible for the
training supplement.
(c) Funds must not be expended under this section unless the funds are
specifically appropriated by the board for the purposes set forth in subsections (a) and
(b).
(d) As used in this section, "local correctional officer" means a jail administrator,
jailer, deputy sheriff, guard, or correctional officer employed by a local governmental
entity, solely in a correctional capacity, and certified as a correctional officer with the
institute.
(e) A county may collaborate with and utilize the board for purposes of carrying
out this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 010652